lexc/inoun.lexc
!============================Gan=============================
!!!!!!!!!just vowel heh
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!¤¤¤¤¤¤¤¤!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON vowelGanComNN
@C.VOWEL@+جگان:@C.VOWEL@¤گان NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جها:@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@×ها NNpostpl;
@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@+جا:@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.ALEF@*ا NNpostpl;
0:0 marefe;
!==============================================================
LEXICON adjFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ adj;

LEXICON adj
@D.VOWEL@:@D.VOWEL@ consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL@:@R.VOWEL@ vowelHaComNN;
@D.VOWEL@+تر:@D.VOWEL@*تر consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+تر:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*تر consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+تر:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*تر consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+تر:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×تر consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+تر:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×تر consnHaComNN;
@D.VOWEL@+ترین:@D.VOWEL@*ترین consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+ترین:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ترین consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+ترین:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ترین consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+ترین:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ترین consnHaComNN;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+ترین:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×ترین consnHaComNN;

LEXICON FINPOINT
@R.FORMAL@+رسمی:@R.FORMAL@0 #;
@D.FORMAL@:@D.FORMAL@ #;
!!!!!!!!@R.VOWEL.ALEF@+الف:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@ #;
!!!!!!!!@R.VOWEL.HEH@+هاه:@R.VOWEL.HEH@ #;

!============================NNpostpl===============================
LEXICON NNpostpl
: shakhsi2;
0:0 nam;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ mosuli;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ nakare;
: other;

LEXICON other
!!! ra-atf-ezafe-rabti
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ ra1;
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×و FINPOINT;
: rabti3;
: ezafe;

LEXICON marefe
@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+معرفه:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ئه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*عه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ئه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*عه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×هه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ئه postMarefe;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+معرفه:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×عه postMarefe;
: NNpostpl;

LEXICON postMarefe
: rabti3;
: ra1;

LEXICON ezafe
!!!!!!final vowel aware
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@+اضافه:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@*ی FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@+اضافه:@R.VOWEL.VAV@*ی FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@+اضافه:@R.VOWEL.HEH@×ی FINPOINT;
!!!!SPECIAL-EZAFE-CONSTRUCTION
!@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@+اضافه:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@*ه FINPOINT;
!@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+اضافه:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ه FINPOINT;

LEXICON nam
!!!!!!final vowel aware
@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ئی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*عی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ئی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*عی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ای rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ئی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×عی rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.YEH@×ای rabti1;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+نم:@R.VOWEL.YEH@*ی rabti1;

LEXICON mosuli
!!!!!!final vowel aware
@D.VOWEL@+موصولی:@D.VOWEL@*ی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*یی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ئی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*عی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*یی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ئی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*عی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ای postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ئی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×عی postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.YEH@×ای postmosuli;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+موصولی:@R.VOWEL.YEH@*ی postmosuli;

LEXICON postmosuli
@P.MOSULI.ON@@C.FORMAL@:@P.MOSULI.ON@@C.FORMAL@ ra1;
@C.FORMAL@:@C.FORMAL@ shakhsi1;

LEXICON nakare
!!!!!!final vowel aware
@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ئی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*عی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ئی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*عی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ای rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ئی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×عی rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.YEH@×ای rabti2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@+نکره:@R.VOWEL.YEH@*ی rabti2;

LEXICON shakhsi1
!!!!input vowel just yeh
+وشخصی۱:*م shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۲:*ت shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۳:*ش shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۴:*مون shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۴:*مان shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۵:*تون shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۵:*تان shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۶:*شون shakhsi1Hub;
+وشخصی۶:*شان shakhsi1Hub;

LEXICON shakhsi1Hub
@D.MOBHAM@:@D.MOBHAM@ rabti1;
: ham1;

LEXICON num
یه FINPOINT;
ی FINPOINT;
LEXICON sent
دالی FINPOINT;!VOWEL_YEH
هان FINPOINT;
اها FINPOINT;
ها FINPOINT;
جون FINPOINT;
زکی FINPOINT;!VOWEL_YEH
زرت FINPOINT;
زارت FINPOINT;
ووی FINPOINT;
هورا FINPOINT;!VOWEL_ALEF
کوفت FINPOINT;
مرض FINPOINT;
والا FINPOINT;
کاشکی FINPOINT;
خب FINPOINT;
باریکلا FINPOINT;
ماشالا FINPOINT;
واه FINPOINT;
یالا FINPOINT;
آخ FINPOINT;
نه‌والا FINPOINT;
